Massachusetts, session 194th, S2646.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
(a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, have the following meanings:-
“Congregate shelter”, a shelter for unhoused persons in which multiple individuals share
common shared sleeping areas without private living quarters.
“Continuum of care”, as defined in Section 578.3 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal
Regulations.
“Non-congregate shelter”, a shelter for unhoused persons in which said persons sleep in
individual or shared bedrooms.
“Permanent supportive housing”, permanent housing in which supportive services are
provided to assist unhoused persons who are experiencing homelessness to live independently.
(b) The executive office of housing and livable communities, in consultation with the
Massachusetts Municipal Association, shall conduct a study to determine: (1) projected future
of 2

shelter and housing demand to determine the type and amount of permanent supportive housing,
non-congregate and congregate shelter programmatic models necessary to reduce reliance on
shelter and meet housing demand; (2) subsequent housing and shelter unit needs per
municipality; (3) an inventory of existing congregate and non-congregate shelter beds; and (4)
the feasibility and costs associated with converting existing congregate beds to non-congregate
housing or permanent supportive housing.
(c) The executive office shall submit a report with: (1) a summary of the results of the
study conducted pursuant to subsection (b); (2) a plan to build sufficient permanent supportive
housing and non-congregate shelter solutions to meet the projected bed needs pursuant to
subsection (b), provided that said report shall include a five-year implementation goal to meet
the unmet needs of affordable housing capacity for each municipality in the commonwealth
based on the results of the study conducted under subsection (b) to ensure adequate permanent
supportive housing capacity statewide; and (3) necessary resources to better support
unaccompanied adult persons experiencing homelessness, including, but not limited to, long-
term vouchers, shallow subsidy pools, rapid re-housing resources, permanent supportive housing,
alternative construction models such as modular construction, micro-units, and repurposed
hotels,; provided that resources must be assessed specifically for unhoused persons with complex
needs, including but not limited to, elderly, disabled, medically complex, or LGBTQ+ persons
experiencing homelessness.
(e) The executive office shall submit the report pursuant to subsection (c) no later than
December 31, 2026, to the house and senate clerks, the house and senate committees on ways
and means and the house and senate chairs of the joint committee on housing.
of 2